Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-455
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person who:

(1) Procures his own enlistment or appointment in the military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

(2) Procures his own separation from the military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his eligibility for that separation, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 55, p. 1575.